ko: 문 단열재: 단열 처리; 비절연; 기타
tr: Kapı Yalıtımı: Yalıtımlı; Yalıtımsız; Diğer
pl: Izolacja drzwi: Izolowane; Nieizolowane; Inne
cs: Izolace dveří: Izolované; Neizolované; Jiné
zh-TW: 隔熱材料: 隔熱型; 非絕緣; 其他
sv: Dörrisolering: Isolerad; Oisolerad; Övrigt
hr-HR: Izolacija vrata: Izolirano; Neizolirano; Ostalo
vi: Cách nhiệt cửa: Giữ nhiệt lượng; Không cách nhiệt; Khác
hu: Ajtószigetelés: Szigetelt; Nem szigetelt; Egyéb
lt-LT: Durų izoliacija: Izoliuotas; Neizoliuotas; Kita
pt-PT: Isolamento de porta: Isolado; Não isolado; Outro
el: Μόνωση πόρτας: Μονωμένο; Μη μονωμένη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Изолация на вратата: Изолирана; Неизолирана; Други
sk-SK: Izolácia dverí: Izolovaný; Neizolovaný; Iné
sl-SI: Izolacija vrat: Izolirano; Neizolirano; Drugo
fr: Isolation de porte: Isotherme; Non isotherme; Autre
fi: Oven eristys: Eristetyt; Eristämätön; Muu
nb: Dørisolasjon: Isolert; Ikke-isolert; Annet
ro-RO: Izolație ușă: Izolată; Neizolată; Altele
da: Dørisolering: Isoleret; Ikke-isoleret; Andet
de: Türisolierung: Wärmegedämmt; Nicht isoliert; Sonstiges
th: ฉนวนประตู: หุ้มฉนวน; ไม่ได้หุ้มฉนวน; อื่นๆ
ru: Изоляция двери: Изолированный; Неизолированный; Другой
nl: Isolatie deur: Geïsoleerd; Niet geïsoleerd; Andere
zh-CN: 门隔热材料: 隔热; 非隔音; 其他
es: Aislamiento de la puerta: Con aislamiento; Sin aislamiento; Otros
en: Door insulation: Insulated; Non-insulated; Other
pt-BR: Isolamento de porta: Térmico; Não térmico; Outro
it: Isolamento della porta: Isolato; Non isolato; Altro
ja: ドア絶縁: 断熱; 非断熱; その他